Virginia statutes. Title 11. Contracts.
Chapter 1. General Provisions.

§ 11-1.
Certain contracts void as to creditors and purchasers unless in writing; law governing validity of contracts creating security interests.

Every contract, not in writing, made in respect to real estate or goods and chattels in consideration of marriage, or made for the conveyance or sale of real estate, or a term therein of more than five years, and, except as otherwise provided in §

8.2-402

of the Uniform Commercial Code, every bill of sale or contract for the sale of goods and chattels when the possession is allowed to remain with the seller, shall be void, both at law and in equity, as to purchasers for value and without notice and creditors; provided, however, that if any such contract or bill of sale as is mentioned in this section creates a security interest as defined in the Uniform Commercial Code, its validity and enforceability shall be governed by the provisions of that Code.

History.

Code 1919, § 5192; 1964, c. 314; 1966, c. 397.

Cross references.

As to when deed or will necessary to convey estate in lands, and invalidity of parol partition or gift of land, see §

55.1-101

.

As to recordation of written contracts or bills of sale mentioned in this section, see §§

55.1-406

through

55.1-408

.

Law Review.

For survey of the Virginia law on contracts and sales for the year 1961-1962, see 48 Va. L. Rev. 1333 (1962).

For note on the developing law in Virginia on installment land contracts, see 37 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1161 (1980).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J. Attachment and Garnishment, § 73; 8B M.J. Frauds, Statute of, § 2; 11A M.J. Judgments and Decrees, § 68; 15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 4; 19 M.J. Trusts and Trustees, § 46.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 24 Contract Actions. § 24.11 Oral and Written Contracts and the Statute of Frauds. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender).
Chapter XIII Contracts. No. 13-101. Assignment of Debt by Creditor, et seq.

§ 11-2.
When written evidence required to maintain action.

Unless a promise, contract, agreement, representation, assurance, or ratification, or some memorandum or note thereof, is in writing and signed by the party to be charged or his agent, no action shall be brought in any of the following cases:

To charge any person upon or by reason of a representation or assurance concerning the character, conduct, credit, ability, trade, or dealings of another, to the intent or purpose that such other may obtain thereby, credit, money, or goods;

To charge any person upon a promise made after attaining the age of majority, to pay a debt contracted during infancy, or upon a ratification after attaining the age of majority, of a promise or simple contract made during infancy;

To charge a personal representative upon a promise to answer any debt or damages out of his own estate;

To charge any person upon a promise to answer for the debt, default, or misdoings of another;

Upon any agreement made upon consideration of marriage;

Upon any contract for the sale of real estate, or for the lease thereof for more than a year;

Upon any agreement or contract for services to be performed in the sale of real estate by a party defined in §

54.1-2100

or §

54.1-2101

;

Upon any agreement that is not to be performed within a year; or

Upon any agreement or promise to lend money or extend credit in an aggregate amount of $25,000 or more.

The consideration need not be set forth or expressed in the writing, and it may be proved (where a consideration is necessary) by other evidence.

History.

Code 1919, § 5561; 1976, c. 157; 1990, c. 570.

Law Review.

For note on crops as personalty or realty relative to the statute of frauds, see 39 Va. L. Rev. 1116 (1953).

For discussion of this section, see 45 Va. L. Rev. 1423 (1959).

For article on the care of the aged and the Virginia statute of frauds, see 19 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 23 (1962).

For survey of Virginia law on property for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1834 (1975).

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1431 (1976).

For survey of Virginia property law for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1469 (1976).

For survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts, and estates for year 1979-80, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 369 (1981).

For survey on employment law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 607 (1989).

For survey on property law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 773 (1989).

For article, “Reconsidering Inducement,” see 76 Va. L. Rev. 877 (1990).

For article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 183 (2010).

For note, “Applying Equitable Estoppel to ERISA Pension Benefit Claims,” see 54 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 627 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3A M.J. Brokers, § 6; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 3; 5C M.J. Deeds, §§ 5, 9; 8B M.J. Frauds, Statute of, §§ 2, 3, 5, 11, 15, 18-20; 9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, § 10; 11B M.J. Landlord and Tenant, § 8; 13A M.J. Mines and Minerals, § 15; 19 M.J. Trusts and Trustees, § 5.

§ 11-2.01.
Promise after bankruptcy must be in writing.

When a debtor is adjudicated a bankrupt or discharged in a bankruptcy proceeding any promise to pay such debt, after such adjudication or discharge, shall be in writing for any action at law or in equity to be maintained thereupon.

History.

Code 1950, § 8-512; 1977, c. 624.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2C M.J. Bankruptcy, § 137; 8A M.J. Executors and Administrators, §§ 313, 315; 8B M.J. Frauds, Statute of, § 5.

§ 11-2.1.
Goods sent by mail.

No suit shall be maintained, or judgment rendered, either at law or in equity, in any court of this Commonwealth, to recover any goods, property or thing, or the value thereof, which has been sent to any person by mail, unless such goods, property or thing has been impliedly or expressly ordered by the person to whom the same has been sent and received or unless it be proved that such person has appropriated such goods, property, or thing to his own use.

History.

1952, c. 326.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1952 act having assigned no number.

§ 11-2.2.
Unsolicited goods deemed gift to recipient.

If any person, firm, partnership, association or corporation, or any agent or employee thereof, shall in any manner or by any means offer for sale goods, wares or merchandise when the offer includes the voluntary and unsolicited sending of any goods, wares or merchandise not actually ordered or requested by the recipient, either orally or in writing, then the sender of any such unsolicited goods, wares or merchandise shall for all purposes be deemed to have made an unconditional gift to the recipient thereof, who may use or dispose of such goods, wares or merchandise in any manner he deems proper without any obligation to return the same to the sender or to pay him therefor.

History.

1970, c. 386.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1970 act having assigned no number.

Law Review.

For survey of legislation on commerce, see 5 U. Rich. L. Rev. 186 (1970).

§ 11-2.3.
Repealed by Acts 1991, c. 458.

§ 11-2.4.
Notice of possible filing of mechanics’ lien required.

Every contract made on or after July 1, 1992, for the purchase of residential real property shall include the following provision:

NOTICE

Virginia law (§

43-1

et seq.) permits persons who have performed labor or furnished materials for the construction, removal, repair or improvement of any building or structure to file a lien against the property.
This lien may be filed at any time after the work is commenced or the material is furnished, but not later than the earlier of (i) 90 days from the last day of the month in which the lienor last performed work or furnished materials or (ii) 90 days from the time the construction, removal, repair or improvement is terminated.

AN EFFECTIVE LIEN FOR WORK PERFORMED PRIOR TO THE DATE OF SETTLEMENT MAY BE FILED AFTER SETTLEMENT.
LEGAL COUNSEL SHOULD BE CONSULTED.

Failure of a contract for the purchase of residential real property to include the notice required by this section shall not void such contract.

History.

1992, c. 606.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12B M.J. Mechanics’ Liens, § 3.

§ 11-3.
Sealed writings; writings not purporting to be sealed.

Any writing to which a natural person, corporation, limited liability company or partnership, whether general or limited, making it affixes a scroll by way of a seal, shall be of the same force as if it were actually sealed. The impression or stamping of a corporate or an official seal on paper or parchment alone shall be as valid as if made on wax or other adhesive substance. And any writing to which a natural person, corporation, limited liability company or partnership, whether general or limited, making it affixes his signature, or their signatures, and which writing in its body says “this deed,” or “this indenture,” or other words importing a sealed instrument, or recognizes a seal, shall be of the same force as if it were actually sealed by such person, corporation, limited liability company or partnership, although no seal or scroll be attached; and any writing signed by a natural person, corporation, limited liability company or partnership, whether general or limited, and regularly acknowledged before an officer authorized to take acknowledgments of deeds to be recorded in this Commonwealth, in the body of which writing it clearly appears that the person so signing and acknowledging the same intends to and does grant or convey unto the grantee named therein certain real estate as therein described, and in which the writing is not said to be a deed or an indenture, and does not purport to be sealed, and to which no seal or scroll is attached, such writing shall pass the title to such real estate as effectually as if it were written and executed in strict accordance with the provisions of §

55.1-300

; and any such writing admitted to record prior to June 19, 1946, shall be of the effect as if made and recorded thereafter, except as to vested rights already attached contrary to such writing.

History.

Code 1919, § 5562; 1934, p. 524; 1946, pp. 59, 426; 1975, c. 500; 1996, c. 265.

Cross references.

As to definition of “Seal,” see §

1-241

.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “55.1-300” for “55-48.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Agency, §§ 13, 46, 76; 5C M.J. Deeds, § 29; 13A M.J. Mortgages and Deeds of Trust, § 27; 16 M.J. Seals and Sealed Instruments, § 1.

§ 11-4.
Sizes of type in printed contracts.

No contract in writing entered into between a citizen of this Commonwealth and any person, firm, company or corporation, domestic or foreign, doing business in this Commonwealth, for the sale and future delivery of any goods or chattels, machinery or mechanical devices, or personal property of any kind or sort whatsoever, shall be binding upon the purchaser, where the form is printed and furnished by the person, firm, company or corporation, unless all of the provisions of such contract are clearly and plainly printed or written; and, where printed, such provisions and covenants and all stipulations as to the rights of the vendor shall be in type of not less than the size known as ten point; and, wherever in such contract, printed upon a form furnished by the vendor, it is stipulated that the vendor is not to be bound by any verbal agreement or modification of the terms of such printed contract, then such stipulation shall be printed as a separate paragraph or paragraphs and in type not smaller than pica. Should any of the contract, including the special stipulation hereinbefore mentioned, be printed in less than the size of type hereby prescribed, and the agent or salesman of such person, firm, company or corporation enter into any verbal or written or collateral agreement with the vendee, on the part of the person, firm, company or corporation, modifying or changing such printed agreement or the parts of the contract which are printed, then the vendee may, in any action instituted to enforce such contract, or the payment of any sum of money agreed to be paid under such contract, be allowed to introduce such collateral agreement, or contract in modification thereof, or any verbal statement made by the agent or salesman in modification thereof, in evidence in such action, and the same, if proved, shall be considered by the court or jury trying the case as a part of such printed contract.

History.

1920, p. 362; Michie Code 1942, § 5562a.

Sizes of type illustrated.

The sizes of type mentioned in this section are as follows:

This is ten point type.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 11, 17, 36, 95, 99; 4A M.J. Contracts, § 54.

§ 11-4.1.
Certain indemnification provisions in construction contracts declared void.

Any provision contained in any contract relating to the construction, alteration, repair or maintenance of a building, structure or appurtenance thereto, including moving, demolition and excavation connected therewith, or any provision contained in any contract relating to the construction of projects other than buildings by which the contractor performing such work purports to indemnify or hold harmless another party to the contract against liability for damage arising out of bodily injury to persons or damage to property suffered in the course of performance of the contract, caused by or resulting solely from the negligence of such other party or his agents or employees, is against public policy and is void and unenforceable.
This section applies to such contracts between contractors and any public body, as defined in §

2.2-4301

.

This section shall not affect the validity of any insurance contract, workers’ compensation, or any agreement issued by an admitted insurer.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any provision of any contract entered into prior to July 1, 1973.

History.

1973, c. 273; 1974, c. 430; 1991, c. 363.

§ 11-4.1:1.
Waiver of payment bond claims and contract claims; construction contracts.

A subcontractor as defined in §

43-1

, lower-tier subcontractor, or material supplier may not waive or diminish his right to assert payment bond claims or his right to assert claims for demonstrated additional costs in a contract in advance of furnishing any labor, services, or materials. A provision that waives or diminishes a subcontractor’s, lower-tier subcontractor’s, or material supplier’s right to assert payment bond claims or his right to assert claims for demonstrated additional costs in a contract executed prior to providing any labor, services, or materials is null and void.

History.

2015, c. 748.

§ 11-4.2.
Repealed by Acts 1975, c. 448.

Cross references.

For present provisions covering money and interest, see Chapters 2 and 3 (§

6.2-200

et seq. and §

6.2-300

et seq.) of Title 6.2.

§ 11-4.3.
When acceleration of payment or repossession of consumer goods not allowed.

Notwithstanding any provisions in a contract, other evidence of indebtedness or security agreement arising from a sale or financing of consumer goods as defined in §

8.9A-102

of this Code, no acceleration of payment or repossession on account of late payment or nonpayment of an installment shall be permitted if payment, together with any late payment penalty permitted under §

6.2-400

, is made within ten days of the date on which the installment was due.

History.

1974, c. 572.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1974 act having been

11-4.2

.

Editor’s note.

Effective October 1, 2010, “§

6.2-400

” was substituted for “§ 6.1-330.80,” to conform to the recodification of Title 6.1 by Acts 2010, c. 794.

Law Review.

For survey of developments in Virginia commercial law for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1475 (1974).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 23, 32, 95, 102.

§ 11-4.4.
Certain indemnification and duty to defend provisions in contracts with design professionals declared void.

Any provision contained in any contract relating to the planning or design of a building, structure or appurtenance thereto, including moving, demolition or excavation connected therewith, or any provision contained in any contract relating to the planning or design of construction projects other than buildings by which the architect or professional engineer performing such work purports to indemnify or hold harmless another party to the contract against liability for damage arising out of bodily injury to persons or damage to property suffered in the course of the performance of the contract, caused by or resulting solely from the negligence of such other party, his agents or employees, is against public policy and is void and unenforceable.

This section shall apply to such contracts between an architect or professional engineer and any public body as defined in §

2.2-4301

. Every provision contained in a contract between an architect or professional engineer and a public body relating to the planning or design of a building, structure or appurtenance thereto, including moving, demolition or excavation connected therewith, or relating to the planning or design of construction projects other than buildings by which the architect or professional engineer performing such work purports to indemnify or hold harmless the public body against liability is against public policy and is void and unenforceable. This section shall not be construed to alter or affect any provision in such a contract that purports to indemnify or hold harmless the public body against liability for damage arising out of the negligent acts, errors or omissions, recklessness or intentionally wrongful conduct of the architect or professional engineer in performance of the contract.

Any provision contained in any contract relating to the planning or design of a building, structure, or appurtenance thereto, including moving, demolition, or excavation connected therewith, or any provision contained in any contract relating to the planning or design of construction projects by which any party purports to impose a duty to defend on any other party to the contract, is against public policy and is void and unenforceable.

This section shall not affect the validity of any insurance contract, workers’ compensation, or any agreement issued by an admitted insurer.

History.

1995, c. 341; 2001, c. 670; 2020, c. 1015.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 341, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any contract entered into prior to July 1, 1995.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 670 added the second and third sentences in the second paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1015 added the next-to-last paragraph.

§ 11-4.5.
Certain indemnification provisions in motor carrier transportation contracts declared void.

As used in this section:“Motor carrier transportation contract” means a contract, agreement, or understanding covering:

The transportation of property for compensation or hire by the motor carrier;

The entrance on property by the motor carrier for the purpose of loading, unloading, or transporting property for compensation or for hire; or

A service incidental to activity described in subdivision 1 or 2 including, but not limited to, storage of property.For the purposes of this section, the term “motor carrier transportation contract” shall not include the Uniform Intermodal Interchange and Facilities Access Agreement administered by the Intermodal Association of North America, as that agreement may be amended by the Intermodal Interchange Executive Committee, or other agreements providing for the interchange, use, or possession of intermodal chassis, containers, or other intermodal equipment.

A provision, clause, covenant, or agreement contained in, collateral to, or affecting a motor carrier transportation contract that purports to indemnify, or hold harmless, or has the effect of indemnifying, or holding harmless, either party from or against any liability for loss or damage resulting from the negligence or intentional acts or omissions of other party, or any agents, employees, servants, or independent contractors who are directly responsible to the other party, is against the public policy and is void and unenforceable.

Nothing contained in this section affects a provision, clause, covenant, or agreement where the motor carrier indemnifies or holds harmless the other party against liability for damages to the extent that the damages were caused by and resulting from the negligence of the motor carrier, its agents, employees, servants, or independent contractors who, in whole or in part are directly responsible to the motor carrier.

History.

2006, cc. 237, 423.

§ 11-4.6.
(Effective until January 1, 2023) Liability of contractor for wages of subcontractor’s employees.

As used in this section, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Construction contract”
means a contract between a general contractor and a subcontractor relating to the construction, alteration, repair, or maintenance of a building, structure, or appurtenance thereto, including moving, demolition, and excavation connected therewith, or any provision contained in any contract relating to the construction of projects other than buildings.

“General contractor”
and

“subcontractor”

have the meanings ascribed thereto in §

43-1

, except that those terms shall not include persons solely furnishing materials.

Any construction contract between a general contractor and its subcontractor and any lower tier subcontract entered into on or after July 1, 2020, shall be deemed to include a provision under which the general contractor, its subcontractor, and the subcontractor at any lower tier are jointly and severally liable to pay the employees of any subcontractor at any lower tier the greater of (i) all wages due to a subcontractor’s employees or to the lower tier subcontractor’s employees at such rate and upon such terms as shall be provided in the employment agreement between the subcontractor and its employees or (ii) the amount of wages that the subcontractor or any lower tier subcontractor is required to pay to its employees under the provisions of applicable law, including the provisions of the Virginia Minimum Wage Act (§

40.1-28.8

et seq.) and the federal Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.).

A general contractor shall be deemed to be the employer of a subcontractor’s employees at any tier for purposes of §

40.1-29

. If the wages due to the subcontractor’s employees under the terms of the employment agreement between a subcontractor and its employees are not paid, the general contractor shall be subject to all penalties, criminal and civil, to which an employer that fails or refuses to pay wages is subject under §

40.1-29

. Any liability of a general contractor pursuant to §

40.1-29

shall be joint and several with the subcontractor that failed or refused to pay the wages to its employees.

Except as otherwise provided in a contract between the general contractor and the subcontractor, the subcontractor shall indemnify the general contractor for any wages, damages, interest, penalties, or attorney fees owed as a result of the subcontractor’s failure to pay wages to the subcontractor’s employees as provided in subsection B, unless the subcontractor’s failure to pay the wages was due to the general contractor’s failure to pay moneys due to the subcontractor in accordance with the terms of their construction contract.

The provisions of this section shall only apply if (i) it can be demonstrated that the general contractor knew or should have known that the subcontractor was not paying his employees all wages due, (ii) the construction contract is related to a project other than a single family residential project, and (iii) the value of the project, or an aggregate of projects under one construction contract, is greater than $500,000. As evidence a general contractor or subcontractor, regardless of tier, may offer a written certification, under oath, from the subcontractor in direct privity of contract with the general contractor or subcontractor stating that (a) the subcontractor and each of his sub-subcontractors has paid all employees all wages due for the period during which the wages are claimed for the work performed on the project and (b) to the subcontractor’s knowledge all sub-subcontractors below the subcontractor, regardless of tier, have similarly paid their employees all such wages. Any person who falsely signs such certification shall be personally liable to the general contractor or subcontractor for fraud and any damages the general contractor or subcontractor may incur.

History.

2020, c. 1038; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 511; 2022, cc. 726, 771.

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the version of this section effective January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered §

11-4.6

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1038, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 511, effective July 1, 2021, added “except that those terms shall not include persons solely furnishing materials” in the definition for “ ‘General contractor’ and ‘subcontractor’ ” in subsection A; and added the last two sentences in subsection E.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by cc. 726 and 771 are identical, and rewrote subsection B, which read: “Any construction contract entered into on or after July 1, 2020, shall be deemed to include a provision under which the general contractor and the subcontractor at any tier are jointly and severally liable to pay any subcontractor’s employees at any tier the greater of (i) all wages due to a subcontractor’s employees at such rate and upon such terms as shall be provided in the employment agreement between the subcontractor and its employees or (ii) the amount of wages that the subcontractor is required to pay to its employees under the provisions of applicable law, including the provisions of the Virginia Minimum Wage Act (§

40.1-28.8

et seq.) and the federal Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.).”; and in subsection E, inserted “or subcontractor” throughout and inserted “or subcontractor, regardless of tier” in the second sentence; and made stylistic changes.

§ 11-4.6.
(Effective January 1, 2023) Liability of contractor for wages of subcontractor’s employees.

As used in this section, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Construction contract”
means a contract between a general contractor and a subcontractor relating to the construction, alteration, repair, or maintenance of a building, structure, or appurtenance thereto, including moving, demolition, and excavation connected therewith, or any provision contained in any contract relating to the construction of projects other than buildings.

“General contractor”
and

“subcontractor”

have the meanings ascribed thereto in §

43-1

, except that those terms shall not include persons solely furnishing materials.

“Owner”
means a person or entity, other than a public body as defined in §

2.2-4301

, responsible for contracting with a general contractor for the procurement of a construction contract.

In any construction contract between an owner and a general contractor, the parties shall include a provision that requires the owner to pay such general contractor within 60 days of the receipt of an invoice following satisfactory completion of the portion of the work for which the general contractor has invoiced. An owner shall not be required to pay amounts invoiced that are subject to withholding pursuant to the contract for the general contractor’s noncompliance with the terms of the contract. However, in the event that an owner withholds all or a part of the amount invoiced by the general contractor under the terms of the contract, the owner shall notify the general contractor, in writing and with reasonable specificity, of his intention to withhold all or part of the general contractor’s payment with the reason for nonpayment. Failure of an owner to make timely payment as provided in this subsection shall result in interest penalties consistent with §

2.2-4355

. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to apply to or prohibit the inclusion of any retainage provisions in a construction contract.

Any contract in which there is at least one general contractor and one subcontractor shall be deemed to include a provision under which any higher-tier contractor is liable to any lower-tier subcontractor with whom the higher-tier contractor contracts for satisfactory performance of the subcontractor’s duties under the contract. Such contract shall require such higher-tier contractor to pay such lower-tier subcontractor within the earlier of (i) 60 days of the satisfactory completion of the portion of the work for which the subcontractor has invoiced or (ii) seven days after receipt of amounts paid by the owner to the general contractor or by the higher-tier contractor to the lower-tier contractor for work performed by a subcontractor pursuant to the terms of the contract. Such contractors shall not be liable for amounts otherwise reducible pursuant to a breach of contract by the subcontractor. However, in the event that a contractor withholds all or a part of the amount invoiced by any lower-tier subcontractor under the contract, the contractor shall notify the subcontractor, in writing, of his intention to withhold all or a part of the subcontractor’s payment with the reason for nonpayment, specifically identifying the contractual noncompliance, the dollar amount being withheld, and the lower-tier subcontractor responsible for the contractual noncompliance. Payment by the party contracting with the contractor shall not be a condition precedent to payment to any lower-tier subcontractor, regardless of that contractor receiving payment for amounts owed to that contractor, unless the party contracting with the contractor is insolvent or a debtor in bankruptcy as defined in §

50-73.79

. Any provision in a contract contrary to this section shall be unenforceable. Failure of a contractor to make timely payment as provided in this subsection shall result in interest penalties consistent with §

2.2-4355

. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to apply to or prohibit the inclusion of any retainage provisions in a construction contract.

Any construction contract between a general contractor and its subcontractor and any lower tier subcontract entered into on or after July 1, 2020, shall be deemed to include a provision under which the general contractor, its subcontractor, and the subcontractor at any lower tier are jointly and severally liable to pay the employees of any subcontractor at any lower tier the greater of (i) all wages due to a subcontractor’s employees or to the lower tier subcontractor’s employees at such rate and upon such terms as shall be provided in the employment agreement between the subcontractor and its employees or (ii) the amount of wages that the subcontractor or any lower tier subcontractor is required to pay to its employees under the provisions of applicable law, including the provisions of the Virginia Minimum Wage Act (§

40.1-28.8

et seq.) and the federal Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 201 et seq.).

A general contractor shall be deemed to be the employer of a subcontractor’s employees at any tier for purposes of §

40.1-29

. If the wages due to the subcontractor’s employees under the terms of the employment agreement between a subcontractor and its employees are not paid, the general contractor shall be subject to all penalties, criminal and civil, to which an employer that fails or refuses to pay wages is subject under §

40.1-29

. Any liability of a general contractor pursuant to §

40.1-29

shall be joint and several with the subcontractor that failed or refused to pay the wages to its employees.

Except as otherwise provided in a contract between the general contractor and the subcontractor, the subcontractor shall indemnify the general contractor for any wages, damages, interest, penalties, or attorney fees owed as a result of the subcontractor’s failure to pay wages to the subcontractor’s employees as provided in subsection d, unless the subcontractor’s failure to pay the wages was due to the general contractor’s failure to pay moneys due to the subcontractor in accordance with the terms of their construction contract.

The provisions of this section shall only apply if (i) it can be demonstrated that the general contractor knew or should have known that the subcontractor was not paying his employees all wages due, (ii) the construction contract is related to a project other than a single family residential project, and (iii) the value of the project, or an aggregate of projects under one construction contract, is greater than $500,000. As evidence a general contractor or subcontractor, regardless of tier, may offer a written certification, under oath, from the subcontractor in direct privity of contract with the general contractor or subcontractor stating that (a) the subcontractor and each of his sub-subcontractors has paid all employees all wages due for the period during which the wages are claimed for the work performed on the project and (b) to the subcontractor’s knowledge all sub-subcontractors below the subcontractor, regardless of tier, have similarly paid their employees all such wages. Any person who falsely signs such certification shall be personally liable to the general contractor or subcontractor for fraud and any damages the general contractor or subcontractor may incur.

History.

2020, c. 1038; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 511; 2022, cc. 726, 771, 727.

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the version of this section effective until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered §

11-4.6

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2022, c. 727, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2023, and shall apply to construction contracts executed on or after January 1, 2023.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 727, effective January 1, 2023, added the “Owner” definition in subsection A; redesignated former subsection B as subsection D and redesignated accordingly; added subsections B and C.

§§ 11-5 through 11-7.
Repealed by Acts 1964, c. 219.

§ 11-7.1.
Certain entities’ authority to extend performance agreements.

The Department of Small Business and Supplier Diversity, the Virginia Economic Development Partnership Authority, the Virginia Tourism Authority, the Tobacco Region Revitalization Commission, a nonprofit, nonstock corporation created pursuant to §

2.2-2240.1

, any county, city, or town, or local or regional industrial or economic development authorities created in accordance with law have the authority, upon the agreement of the parties, to extend the performance period for any performance agreement.

For the purposes of this section, “performance agreement” means any agreement, contract, or memorandum of understanding that imposes an obligation for minimum private investment or the creation of new jobs in exchange for grants or other funds, or loans of money from an entity specified in subsection A.

Nothing in this section shall be construed or interpreted to authorize or allow for any payment or appropriation of funds except as provided in the general appropriation act.

History.

2009, c. 224; 2013, c. 482.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, c. 224 has been codified as §

11-7.1

at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “Tobacco Region Revitalization Commission” was substituted for “Tobacco Indemnification and Community Revitalization Commission” in subsection A to conform to Acts 2015, cc. 399 and 433.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 482, effective January 1, 2014, substituted “Small Business and Supplier Diversity” for “Business Assistance” near the beginning of subsection A.